Utah statutes.
41-6a-1713.   Penalty for littering on a highway.

(1)  A person who violates any of the provisions of Section 41-6a-1712 is guilty of a class C misdemeanor and shall be fined:

(a)  not less than $100 for a violation; or

(b)  not less than $250 for a second or subsequent violation within three years of a previous violation of this section.

(2)  The sentencing judge may require that the offender devote at least eight hours in cleaning up:

(a)  litter caused by the offender; and

(b)  existing litter from a safe area designated by the sentencing judge.



Amended by Chapter 22, 2008 General Session

